Utah statutes.
13-11-6.   Service of process.

(1)  In addition to any other method provided by rule or statute, personal jurisdiction over a supplier may be acquired in a civil action or proceeding instituted in the district court by the service of process as provided in Subsection (3).

(2) (a)  A supplier that engages in any act or practice in this state governed by this chapter, or engages in a consumer transaction subject to this chapter, may designate an agent upon whom service of process may be made in the state. 

(b)  A designation of an agent under Subsection (2)(a) shall be in writing and filed with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code.

(c)  An agent designated under this Subsection (2) shall be a resident of or a corporation authorized to do business in the state. 

(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), process upon a supplier may be served as provided in Section 16-17-301 if:

(i)  a designation is not made and filed under Subsection (2); or

(ii)  process cannot be served in the state upon the designated agent.

(b)  Service upon a supplier is not effective unless the plaintiff promptly mails a copy of the process and pleadings by registered or certified mail to the defendant at the defendant's last reasonably ascertainable address. 

(c)  The plaintiff shall file an affidavit of compliance with this section:

(i)  with the clerk of the court; and

(ii)  on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within any future time the court allows.

